Tennessee, session 114, HB0213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-4-603, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e) Prior to January 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the chair of
the transportation and safety committee of the senate and the chair of the transportation
committee of the house of representatives on the status of projects to be funded under
the high priority bridge replacement program.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0213
000129
- 1 -